Missouri, session 2026, SB1025.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 192.2410, RSMo, is repealed and one
new section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section
192.2410, to read as follows:
192.2410. 1. A report made under section 192.2405
shall be made orally or in writing. It shall include, if
known:
(1) The name, age, and address of the eligible adult;
(2) The name and address of any person responsible for
care of the eligible adult;
(3) The nature and extent of the condition of the
eligible adult; and
(4) Other relevant information.
2. Reports regarding persons determined not to be
eligible adults as defined in section 192.2400 shall be
referred to the appropriate state or local authorities.
3. The department shall maintain a statewide toll-free
phone number for receipt of reports and shall operate the
hotline continuously for twenty-four hours a day, seven days
a week.
✓